District of Columbia statutes.
11-710

Emergency authority to conduct proceedings outside District of Columbia.

(a)

In general. —

The court may hold special sessions at any place within the United States outside the District of Columbia as the nature of the business may require and upon such notice as the court orders, upon a finding by either the chief judge of the court (or, if the chief judge is absent or disabled, the judge designated under section 11-706(a)) or the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration in the District of Columbia that, because of emergency conditions, no location within the District of Columbia is reasonably available where such special sessions could be held. The court may transact any business at a special session authorized pursuant to this section which it has the authority to transact at a regular session.

(b)

Notice requirements. —

If the Court of Appeals issues an order exercising its authority under subsection (a), the court—

(1)

through the Joint Committee on Judicial Administration in the District of Columbia, shall send notice of such order, including the reasons for the issuance of such order, to the Committee on Homeland Security and Governmental Affairs of the Senate and the Committee on Government Reform of the House of Representatives; and

(2)

shall provide reasonable notice to the United States Marshals Service before the commencement of any special session held pursuant to such order.

Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2024, Pub. L. 109-356, § 114(a)(1)